Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 13.1 Motor Carrier Transportation Contracts

39-13.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Motor carrier” means a contract carrier, a common carrier, or a private carrier of property or passengers by motor vehicle.

“Motor carrier transportation contract” means a contract, agreement, or understanding covering:

The transportation of property for compensation by a motor carrier or a service incidental thereof;

Entrance on property by a motor carrier for the purposes of loading, unloading, or transporting property for compensation or a service incidental thereof; or

A service incidental to an activity described in subsections (2)(i) and (2)(ii).

“Promisee” means the promisee and any agents, employees, servants, or independent contractors who are directly responsible to the promisee except for motor carriers party to a motor carrier transportation contract with the promisee, and the motor carrier’s agents, employees, servants, or independent contractors directly responsible to the motor carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 89, § 1.

39-13.1-2.
Indemnity agreement in motor carrier transportation contract void.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapters 12 and 13 of this title, or any general or public law to the contrary, any provision, clause, covenant, or agreement contained in a motor carrier transportation contract that purports to indemnify, defend, or hold harmless, or has the effect of indemnifying, defending, or holding harmless, an indemnitee from or against any liability for loss or damage resulting from the indemnitee’s negligence or intentional acts or omissions shall be void and unenforceable.

This section does not apply to the Uniform Intermodal Interchange and Facilities Access Agreement administered by the Intermodal Association of North America or other agreements providing for the interchange, use, or possession of intermodal chassis or other intermodal equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 89, § 1.

39-13.1-3.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to motor carrier transportation contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this chapter [June 28, 2018].

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 89, § 1.